Vermont, session 2025-2026, H137.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 23 is amended to read:
§ 23. CONFIDENTIALITY OF INVESTIGATION AND EXAMINATION
REPORTS
(a) This section shall apply to all persons licensed, authorized, or
registered, or required to be licensed, authorized, or registered, under this title
or under 9 V.S.A. chapter 150 by the Commissioner.
(b) Regardless of source, all records of investigations, including
information pertaining to a complaint by or for a consumer, and all records and
reports of examinations by the Commissioner, whether in the possession of a
supervisory agency or another person, shall be confidential and privileged,
shall not be made public, and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction
into evidence in any private civil action. No person who participated on behalf
of the Commissioner in an investigation or examination shall be permitted or
required to testify in any such civil action as to any findings,
recommendations, opinions, results, or other actions relating to the
investigation or examination.
(c) The Commissioner may, in his or her the Commissioner’s discretion,
disclose or publish or authorize the disclosure or publication of any such
record or report or any part thereof in the furtherance of legal or regulatory
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 2 of 52
2025
proceedings brought as a part of the Commissioner’s official duties. The
Commissioner may, in his or her the Commissioner’s discretion, disclose or
publish or authorize the disclosure or publication of any such record or report
or any part thereof, to civil or criminal law enforcement authorities for use in
the exercise of such authority’s duties, in such manner as the Commissioner
may deem proper.
(d) For the purposes of this section, records of investigations and records
and reports of examinations shall include joint examinations by the
Commissioner and any other supervisory agency. Records of investigations
and reports of examinations shall also include records of examinations and
investigations conducted by:
(1) any agency with supervisory jurisdiction over the person; and
(2) any agency of any foreign government with supervisory jurisdiction
over any person subject to the jurisdiction of the Department, when such
records are considered confidential by such agency or foreign government and
the records are in the possession of the Commissioner.
Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 3303 is amended to read:
§ 3303. MUTUAL COMPANIES; DIRECTORS, CHARTER PROVISIONS
AS TO
The articles of association or bylaws of a mutual insurer shall set forth the
manner in which its board of directors or other governing body shall be
elected, and in which meetings of policyholders shall be called, held, and
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 3 of 52
2025
conducted, subject to such procedures as may be required by the
Commissioner under section 75 subsection 15(a) of this title.
Sec. 3. 8 V.S.A. § 4688(a) is amended to read:
(a) Filings as to competitive markets. Except with respect to filings
submitted pursuant to section 4687 of this title, in a competitive market, every
insurer shall file with the Commissioner all rates and supplementary rate
information, and supporting information that are to be used in this State,
provided that such rates and information need not be filed for specifically rated
inland marine risks or such other risks that are designated by regulation of the
Commissioner as not requiring a filing. Such rates, supplementary rate
information, and supporting information shall be provided to the
Commissioner not later than 15 days after 30 days prior to the effective date.
An insurer may adopt by reference, with or without deviation or modification,
provided that said deviation or modification is readily identifiable, the rates,
supplementary rate information, and supporting information filed by another
insurer or an advisory or service organization with which it is affiliated;
provided, however, such an adoption shall not relieve an insurer from any
other requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 4. 8 V.S.A. § 4724 is amended to read:
§ 4724. UNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION OR UNFAIR OR
DECEPTIVE ACTS OR PRACTICES DEFINED
* * *
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 4 of 52
2025
(23) Affordable housing; unfair discrimination.
(A) An insurer that issues or delivers in this State a policy of
insurance covering loss of or damage to real property containing units for
residential purposes or legal liability of an owner or renter of such real
property shall not cancel, refuse to issue, refuse to renew, or increase the
premium of a policy, or exclude, limit, restrict, or reduce coverage under a
policy, based on the following:
(i) whether the residential building contains dwelling units that are
required to be affordable to residents at a specific income level pursuant to a
statute, regulation, restrictive declaration, or regulatory agreement with a local,
State, or federal government entity;
(ii) whether the real property owner or tenants of such residential
building or the shareholders of a cooperative housing corporation receive
rental assistance provided by a local, State, or federal government entity,
including the receipt of federal vouchers issued under Section 8 of the U.S.
Housing Act of 1937, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f;
(iii) the level or source of income of the tenants of the residential
building or the shareholders of a cooperative housing corporation; or
(iv) whether the residential building is owned by a limited-equity
cooperative, public housing agency, or cooperative housing corporation.
(B) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from cancelling,
refusing to issue, refusing to renew, or increasing the premium of an insurance
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 5 of 52
2025
policy, or excluding, limiting, restricting, or reducing coverage under a policy,
due to other factors that are permitted or not prohibited by any other section of
this chapter.
Sec. 5. 8 V.S.A. § 6002(a) is amended to read:
(a) Any captive insurance company, when permitted by its articles of
association, charter, or other organizational document, may apply to the
Commissioner for a license to do any and all conduct insurance business
comprised in subdivisions 3301(a)(1), (2), (3)(A)-(C), (E)-(Q), and (4)-(9)
section 3301 of this title and may grant annuity contracts as defined in section
3717 of this title and may accept or transfer risk by means of a parametric
contract; provided, however, that:
(1) No pure captive insurance company may insure any risks other than
those of its parent and affiliated companies or controlled unaffiliated business.
(2) No agency captive insurance company may do any insurance
business in this State unless:
(A) an insurance agency or brokerage that owns or controls the
agency captive insurance company remains in regulatory good standing in all
states in which it is licensed;
(B) it insures only the risks of the commercial policies that are placed
by or through an insurance agency or brokerage that owns or directly or
indirectly controls the agency captive insurance company and, if required by
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 6 of 52
2025
the Commissioner in his or her the Commissioner’s discretion, it provides the
Commissioner the form of such commercial policies;
(C) it discloses to the original policyholder or policyholders, in a
form or manner approved by the Commissioner, that the agency captive
insurance company as a result of its affiliation with an insurance agency or
brokerage may enter into a reinsurance or other risk-sharing agreement with
the agency or brokerage; and
(D) if required by the Commissioner in his or her the
Commissioner’s discretion, the business written by an agency captive
insurance company is:
(i) Fronted by an insurance company licensed under the laws of
any state.
(ii) Reinsured by a reinsurer authorized or approved by the State
of Vermont.
(iii) Secured by a trust fund in the United States for the benefit of
policyholders and claimants or funded by an irrevocable letter of credit or
other arrangement that is acceptable to the Commissioner. The Commissioner
may require the agency captive insurance company to increase the funding of
any security arrangement established under this subdivision. If the form of
security is a letter of credit, the letter of credit shall be issued or confirmed by a
bank approved by the Commissioner. A trust maintained pursuant to this
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 7 of 52
2025
subdivision shall be established in a form and upon terms approved by the
Commissioner.
(3) No association captive insurance company may insure any risks
other than those of its association, those of the member organizations of its
association, and those of a member organization’s affiliated companies.
(4) No industrial insured captive insurance company may insure any
risks other than those of the industrial insureds that comprise the industrial
insured group, those of their affiliated companies, and those of the controlled
unaffiliated business of an industrial insured or its affiliated companies.
(5) No risk retention group may insure any risks other than those of its
members and owners.
(6) No captive insurance company may provide personal motor vehicle
or homeowner’s insurance coverage or any component thereof.
(7) No captive insurance company may accept or cede reinsurance
except as provided in section 6011 of this title.
(8) Any captive insurance company may provide excess workers’
compensation insurance to its parent and affiliated companies, unless
prohibited by the federal law or laws of the state having jurisdiction over the
transaction. Any captive insurance company, unless prohibited by federal law,
may reinsure workers’ compensation of a qualified self-insured plan of its
parent and affiliated companies.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 8 of 52
2025
(9) Any captive insurance company that insures risks described in
subdivisions 3301(a)(1) and (2) of this title shall comply with all applicable
State and federal laws.
(10) Any captive insurance company that transfers risk by means of a
parametric contract shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws and
regulations.
Sec. 6. 8 V.S.A. § 6004(d) is amended to read:
(d) Within 30 days after commencing business, each captive insurance
company shall file with the Commissioner a statement under oath of its
president and secretary or, in the case of a captive insurance company formed
as a limited liability company or as a reciprocal insurer, of two individuals
authorized by the governing board certifying that the captive insurance
company possessed the requisite unimpaired, paid-in capital and surplus prior
to commencing business.
Sec. 7. 8 V.S.A. § 6006 is amended to read:
§ 6006. FORMATION OF CAPTIVE INSURANCE COMPANIES IN THIS
STATE
* * *
(h) Other than captive insurance companies formed as limited liability
companies under 11 V.S.A. chapter 21 chapter 25 or as nonprofit corporations
under Title 11B, captive insurance companies formed as corporations under the
provisions of this chapter shall have the privileges and be subject to the
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 9 of 52
2025
provisions of Title 11A as well as the applicable provisions contained in this
chapter. In the event of conflict between the provisions of said general
corporation law and the provisions of this chapter, the latter shall control.
(i) Captive insurance companies formed under the provisions of this
chapter:
(1) As limited liability companies shall have the privileges and be
subject to the provisions of 11 V.S.A. chapter 21 chapter 25 as well as the
applicable provisions contained in this chapter. In the event of a conflict
between the provisions of 11 V.S.A. chapter 21 chapter 25 and the provisions
of this chapter, the latter shall control.
(2) As nonprofit corporations shall have the privileges and be subject to
the provisions of Title 11B as well as the applicable provisions contained in
this chapter. In the event of conflict between the provisions of Title 11B and
the provisions of this chapter, the latter shall control.
(3) As mutual insurers shall have the privileges and be subject to the
provisions of sections 3303 and 3311 of this title as well as the applicable
provisions contained in this chapter. In the event of a conflict between the
provisions of sections 3303 and 3311 of this title and the provisions of this
chapter, the latter shall control.
* * *
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 10 of 52
2025
Sec. 8. 8 V.S.A. § 6006a(a) is amended to read:
(a) Any captive insurance company meeting the qualifications set forth in
subdivision 6006(j)(1) of this title may merge with any other insurer, whether
licensed in this State or elsewhere, in the following manner:
(1) The board of directors of each insurer shall, by a resolution adopted
by a majority vote of the members of such board, approve a joint agreement of
merger setting forth:
(A) the names of the insurers proposed to merge, and the name of the
insurer into which they propose to merge, which is hereafter designated as the
surviving company;
(B) the terms and conditions of the proposed merger and the mode of
carrying the same into effect;
(C) the manner and basis of converting the ownership interests, if
applicable, in other than the surviving insurer into ownership interests or other
consideration, securities, or obligations of the surviving insurer;
(D) a restatement of such provisions of the articles of incorporation
of the surviving insurer as may be deemed necessary or advisable to give effect
to the proposed merger; and
(E) any other provisions with respect to the proposed merger as are
deemed necessary or desirable.
(2) The resolution of the board of directors of each insurer approving the
agreement shall direct that the agreement be submitted to a vote of the
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 11 of 52
2025
shareholders, members, or policyholders, as the case may be, of each insurer
entitled to vote in respect thereof at a designated meeting thereof, or via
unanimous written consent of such shareholders, members, or policyholders in
lieu of a meeting. Notice of the meeting shall be given as provided in the
bylaws, charter, or articles of association, or other governance document, as
the case may be, of each insurer and shall specifically reflect the agreement as
a matter to be considered at the meeting.
(3) The agreement of merger so approved shall be submitted to a vote of
the shareholders, members, or policyholders, as the case may be, of each
insurer entitled to vote in respect thereof at the meeting directed by the
resolution of the board of directors of such company approving the agreement,
and the agreement shall be unanimously adopted by the shareholders,
members, or policyholders, as the case may be.
(4) Following the adoption of the agreement by any insurer, articles of
merger shall be adopted in the following manner:
(A) Upon the execution of the agreement of merger by all of the
insurers parties thereto, there shall be executed and filed, in the manner
hereafter provided, articles of merger setting forth the agreement of merger, the
signatures of the several insurers parties thereto, the manner of its adoption,
and the vote by which adopted by each insurer.
(B) The articles of merger shall be signed on behalf of each insurer
by a duly authorized officer or, in the case of an insurer formed as a limited
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 12 of 52
2025
liability company or as a reciprocal insurer, by an individual authorized by the
governing board, in such multiple copies as shall be required to enable the
insurers to comply with the provisions of this subchapter with respect to filing
and recording the articles of merger, and shall then be presented to the
Commissioner.
(C) The Commissioner shall approve the articles of merger if he or
she the Commissioner finds that the merger will promote the general good of
the State in conformity with those standards set forth in section 3305 of this
title. If he or she the Commissioner approves the articles of merger, he or she
the Commissioner shall issue a certificate of approval of merger.
(5) The insurer shall file the articles of merger, accompanied by the
agreement of merger and the certificate of approval of merger, with the
Secretary of State and pay all fees as required by law. If the Secretary of State
finds that they conform to law, he or she the Secretary shall issue a certificate
of merger and return it to the surviving insurer or its representatives. The
merger shall take effect upon the filing of articles of merger with the Secretary
of State, unless a later effective date is specified therein.
(6) The surviving insurer shall file a copy of the certificate of merger
from the Secretary of State with the Commissioner.
Sec. 9. 8 V.S.A. § 6007(b) is amended to read:
(b) Prior to March 1 of each year, and prior to March 15 of each year in the
case of pure captive insurance companies, association captive insurance
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 13 of 52
2025
companies, sponsored captive insurance companies, industrial insured captive
insurance companies, or agency captive insurance companies, each captive
insurance company shall submit to the Commissioner a report of its financial
condition, verified by oath of two of its executive officers or, in the case of a
captive insurance company formed as a limited liability company or as a
reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by the governing board. Each
captive insurance company shall report using generally accepted accounting
principles, statutory accounting principles, or international financial reporting
standards unless the Commissioner requires, approves, or accepts the use of
any other comprehensive basis of accounting, in each case with any
appropriate or necessary modifications or adaptations thereof required or
approved or accepted by the Commissioner for the type of insurance and kinds
of insurers to be reported upon, and as supplemented by additional information
required by the Commissioner. As used in this section, statutory accounting
principles shall mean the accounting principles codified in the NAIC
Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual. Upon application for
admission, a captive insurance company shall select, with explanation, an
accounting method for reporting. Any change in a captive insurance
company’s accounting method shall require prior approval. Except as
otherwise provided, each risk retention group shall file its report in the form
required by subsection 3561(a) of this title, and each risk retention group shall
comply with the requirements set forth in section 3569 of this title. The
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 14 of 52
2025
Commissioner shall by rule propose the forms in which pure captive insurance
companies, association captive insurance companies, sponsored captive
insurance companies, and industrial insured captive insurance companies shall
report. Subdivision 6002(c)(3) of this title shall apply to each report filed
pursuant to this section, except that such subdivision shall not apply to reports
filed by risk retention groups.
Sec. 10. 8 V.S.A. § 6011(a) is amended to read:
(a) Any captive insurance company may provide reinsurance, of policies
approved by the Commissioner comprised in subsection 3301(a) section 3301
of this title, on risks of its parent, affiliated companies, and controlled
unaffiliated business ceded by any other insurer, and may provide reinsurance
of annuity contracts as defined in section 3717 of this title that are granted by
any other insurer.
Sec. 11. 8 V.S.A. § 6024(c) is amended to read:
(c) A dormant captive insurance company that has been issued a certificate
of dormancy shall:
(1) possess and thereafter maintain unimpaired, paid-in capital and
surplus of not less than $25,000.00; provided, however, that if the dormant
captive insurance company had never capitalized, it shall not be required to
add capital upon entering dormancy;
(2) prior to March 15 of each year, submit to the Commissioner a report
of its financial condition, verified by oath of two of its executive officers or, in
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 15 of 52
2025
the case of a captive insurance company formed as a limited liability company
or as a reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by its governing board,
in a form as may be prescribed by the Commissioner; and
(3) pay a license renewal fee of $500.00.
Sec. 12. 8 V.S.A. § 6045 is amended to read:
§ 6045. BRANCH CAPTIVE REPORTS
Prior to March 15 of each year, or with the approval of the Commissioner
within 75 days after its fiscal year-end, a branch captive insurance company
shall file with the Commissioner a copy of all reports and statements required
to be filed under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the alien captive
insurance company is formed, verified by oath of two of its executive officers
or, in the case of a branch captive insurance company formed as a limited
liability company or as a reciprocal insurer, of two individuals authorized by
the governing board. If the Commissioner is satisfied that the annual report
filed by the alien captive insurance company in its domiciliary jurisdiction
provides adequate information concerning the financial condition of the alien
captive insurance company, the Commissioner may waive the requirement for
completion of the captive annual statement for business written in the alien
jurisdiction.
Sec. 13. 8 V.S.A. § 6048d(c)(2) is amended to read:
(2) The special purpose financial insurance company shall submit an
affidavit of its president, a vice president, the treasurer, or the chief financial
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 16 of 52
2025
officer or, in the case of a special purpose financial insurance company formed
as a limited liability company or as a reciprocal insurer, of an individual
authorized by the governing board that includes the following statements, to
the best of such person’s knowledge and belief after reasonable inquiry:
(A) the proposed organization and operation of the special purpose
financial insurance company comply with all applicable provisions of this
chapter;
(B) the special purpose financial insurance company’s investment
policy reflects and takes into account the liquidity of assets and the reasonable
preservation, administration, and management of such assets with respect to
the risks associated with the reinsurance contract and the insurance
securitization transaction; and
(C) the reinsurance contract and any arrangement for securing the
special purpose financial insurance company’s obligations under such
reinsurance contract, including any agreements or other documentation to
implement such arrangement, comply with the provisions of this subchapter.
Sec. 14. 8 V.S.A. § 6052(g) is amended to read:
(g) This subsection establishes governance standards for a risk retention
group.
(1) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Board of directors” or “board” means the governing body of a
risk retention group elected by risk retention group members to establish
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 17 of 52
2025
policy, elect or appoint officers and committees, and make other governing
decisions.
(B) “Director” means a natural person designated in the articles of
the risk retention group or designated, elected, or appointed by any other
manner, name, or title to act as a member of the governing body of the risk
retention group.
(C)(i) “Independent director” means a director who does not have a
material relationship with the risk retention group. A director has a material
relationship with a risk retention group if he or she the director, or a member of
his or her the director’s immediate family:
(I)(i) In any 12-month period, receives from the risk retention
group, or from a consultant or service provider to the risk retention group,
compensation or other item or items of value in an amount equal to or greater
than five percent of the risk retention group’s gross written premium or two
percent of the risk retention group’s surplus, as measured at the end of any
fiscal quarter falling in such 12-month period, whichever is greater. This
provision also applies to compensation or items of value received by any
business with which the director is affiliated. Such material relationship shall
continue for one year after receipt of the item or items of value or the
compensation falls below the threshold established in this subdivision.
(II)(ii) Has a relationship with an auditor as follows: Is affiliated
with or employed in a professional capacity by a current or former internal or
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 18 of 52
2025
external auditor of the risk retention group. Such material relationship shall
continue for one year after the affiliation or employment ends.
(aa)(iii) Is employed as an executive officer of another business
entity that is affiliated with the risk retention group by virtue of common
ownership and control, if such entity meets all of the following criteria:
(AA)(I) the entity is not an insured of the risk retention group;
(BB)(II) the entity has a contractual relationship with the risk
retention group; and
(CC)(III) the governing board of the entity includes executive
officers of the risk retention group, unless a majority of the membership of
such entity’s governing board is composed of individuals who are members of
the governing board of the risk retention group.
(bb)(IV) Such material relationship shall continue until the
employment or service ends.
(ii)(iv) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) subdivisions (i)–(iii) of
this subdivision (g)(1)(C), a director who is a direct or indirect owner of the
risk retention group is deemed to be independent; and an officer, director, or
employee of an insured of the risk retention group is deemed to be
independent, unless some other relationship of such officer, director, or
employee qualifies as a material relationship.
(D) “Material service provider” includes a captive manager, auditor,
accountant, actuary, investment advisor, attorney, managing general
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 19 of 52
2025
underwriter, or other person responsible for underwriting, determination of
rates, premium collection, claims adjustment or settlement, or preparation of
financial statements, whose aggregate annual contract fees are equal to or
greater than five percent of the risk retention group’s annual gross written
premium or two percent of its surplus, whichever is greater. It does not mean
defense counsel retained by a risk retention group, unless his or her the defense
counsel’s annual fees have been equal to or greater than five percent of a risk
retention group’s annual gross premium or two percent of its surplus,
whichever is greater, during three or more of the previous five years.
* * *
(9) The president or chief executive officer or, in the case of a risk
retention group formed as a limited liability company or as a reciprocal insurer,
an individual authorized by the board of directors of a risk retention group
shall promptly notify the Commissioner in writing of any known material
noncompliance with the governance standards established in this subsection.
Sec. 15. 8 V.S.A. § 2504 is amended to read:
§ 2504. EXEMPTIONS
This chapter does not apply to:
* * *
(18) A person that performs payroll calculations, prepares payroll
instructions, prepares and files State or federal income withholding tax reports
and unemployment insurance compensation reports, or provides other payroll-
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 20 of 52
2025
related services, but that does not engage in the business of payroll processing
services or otherwise engage in the business of money transmission in this
State or other acts requiring a license under this chapter.
(19) A person that does not provide payroll processing services to any
employer that has its principal place of business in this State and that does not
otherwise engage in the business of money transmission in this State or other
acts requiring a license under this chapter.
(20) A person that:
(A) provides payroll processing services to 25 or fewer employers
that have their principal place of business in this State;
(B) provides payroll processing services to 500 or fewer employers,
regardless of where the principal place of business of each employer is located;
(C) provides payroll processing services involving transmission to
less than 300 Vermont resident employees, regardless of where the principal
place of business of their employer is located;
(D) has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a
felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court, and no key individual or person
in control of such person has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo
contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court;
(E) has never had a financial services license or professional license
revoked in any jurisdiction and no key individual or person in control of such
person has ever had a financial services license or professional license revoked
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 21 of 52
2025
in any jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of such revocation
shall not be deemed a revocation;
(F) does not otherwise engage in the business of money transmission
in this State or other acts requiring a license under this chapter; and
(G) receives and holds all money or monetary value received for
transmission exclusively in:
(i) segregated trust accounts with federally insured financial
institutions or credit unions for the benefit of its employer customers or
applicable governmental authorities, such that the funds in such accounts are
not subject to claims or liens of its creditors; or
(ii) deposit accounts at federally insured financial institutions or
credit unions that are both titled in the name and tax identification number of
the financial institution or credit union and for the benefit of the person’s
customers.
Sec. 16. 9 V.S.A. § 42 is amended to read:
§ 42. PERMITTED CHARGES
(a) Except for interest as provided in this chapter, a lender shall make no
charges against a borrower for the use or forbearance of money other than:
* * *
(7) the reasonable cost of private mortgage guaranty insurance subject to
such limitation as the Commissioner of Financial Regulation has approved;
and
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 22 of 52
2025
(8) the reasonable fees associated with a credit card, agreed upon by the
lender and borrower, including late charges and over-limit charges; and
(9) discount points, at the request of the borrower for the purpose of
reducing, and which in fact result in a bona fide reduction of, the interest rate
or time-price differential applicable to the loan.
(b) A borrower may procure an opinion and abstract of title from an
attorney of his or her the borrower’s choice acceptable to the lender, or hazard
insurance in a company or in companies of his or her the borrower’s choice
acceptable to the lender, and in such cases the lender’s acceptance shall not be
unreasonably withheld.
Sec. 17. STUDY; BANKS; SUSPICIOUS ACTIVITY; TRANSACTION
HOLD
(a) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation or designee shall study
regulatory models that would allow a financial institution to take measures to
protect account holders from fraudulent transactions and shall recommend a
model for legislative consideration. The study shall include a review of
regulatory models enacted or proposed in other jurisdictions.
(b) In conducting the study required by this section, the Commissioner
shall consult with a representative from the Vermont Bankers Association, the
Association of Vermont Credit Unions, AARP Vermont, the Office of the
Attorney General, Vermont Legal Aid, and any other person deemed
appropriate by the Commissioner.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 23 of 52
2025
(c) Among other things, the study shall include recommendations regarding
the following:
(1) the financial institutions subject to the proposed model;
(2) whether specific account holders, such as seniors or vulnerable
populations, should receive heightened protection;
(3) notification and consultation requirements available to an account
holder suspected to be the victim of fraudulent activity;
(4) a reasonable time period for imposing a transaction hold pending the
outcome of an internal investigation;
(5) notification to the Department of Financial Regulation and, if
appropriate, law enforcement or other third parties if fraudulent activity is
suspected;
(6) continued account holder access to funds for transactions not
suspected of being associated with fraudulent activity;
(7) immunity from civil liability for any financial institution that acts in
good faith for the purpose of protecting account holders from fraudulent
activity and that otherwise complies with applicable legal requirements; and
(8) any other provision deemed appropriate by the Commissioner.
(d) On or before November 15, 2025, the Commissioner shall provide a
status report on the Commissioner’s preliminary findings and
recommendations to the Chair of the House Committee on Commerce and
Economic Development and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 24 of 52
2025
and, on or before January 15, 2026, shall submit a final report in draft form to
the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the
Senate Committee on Finance.
Sec. 18. STUDY; PROTECTIONS FOR VICTIMS OF COERCED DEBT
(a) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation or designee shall study
regulatory models for providing protections and remedies for victims of
coerced debt and shall recommend a model appropriate for Vermont. In
particular, the Commissioner shall review the Model State Coerced Debt Law
prepared by the National Consumer Law Center in May of 2024, as well as
laws enacted or proposed in other jurisdictions.
(b) In conducting the study required by this section, the Commissioner
shall consult with a representative from the Vermont Network, the Vermont
Bankers Association, the Association of Vermont Credit Unions, the Office of
the Attorney General, Vermont Legal Aid, and any other person deemed
appropriate by the Commissioner.
(c) Among other things, the study shall include recommendations regarding
the following:
(1) a definition of coerced debt;
(2) whether coerced debt should include both secured and unsecured
debt;
(3) the requisite information a debtor must provide a creditor when
alleging coerced debt;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 25 of 52
2025
(4) procedures a creditor must follow regarding the investigation of an
allegation of coerced debt, including ceasing collection efforts and notifying
the Department of Financial Regulation, the Office of the Attorney General,
and other law enforcement personnel, if appropriate;
(5) whether a credit reporting agency should remove coerced debt from
a credit report and, if so, the process for doing so;
(6) whether Vermont’s identity theft law, 13 V.S.A. § 2030, should be
expanded to more specifically reference instances of coerced debt; and
(7) any other provision deemed appropriate by the Commissioner.
(d) On or before January 15, 2026, the Commissioner shall report the
Commissioner’s findings and recommendations in draft form to the House
Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate
Committee on Finance.
Sec. 19. RECOMMENDATION REGARDING INSURANCE AND
GENETIC PRIVACY
On or before November 15, 2025, and for the purpose of preventing unfair
genetic discrimination and safeguarding an individual’s genetic privacy, the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall provide a recommendation to the
House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate
Committee on Finance on whether Vermont should enact a law prohibiting or
limiting an insurance company’s access to a consumer’s personalized genetic
report that is not part of the consumer’s medical record. Among other things,
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 26 of 52
2025
the Commissioner shall consider whether to require that an insurance company
obtain consumer consent prior to the disclosure of genetic information
obtained from a direct-to-consumer entity to an insurance company, including
any company that offers health, long-term care, life, or disability insurance.
Sec. 20. 8 V.S.A. § 4062b is amended to read:
§ 4062b. MEDICARE SUPPLEMENTAL HEALTH SUPPLEMENT
INSURANCE RATE REVIEW
(a) Within five business days after receiving any request to increase the
premium rate for a Medicare supplement insurance policy from the health
insurance company, hospital or medical service organization, or health
maintenance organization issuing the policy, the Department shall post
information about the rate filing on the Department’s website, including:
(1) the name of the health insurance company, hospital or medical
service organization, or health maintenance organization requesting the rate
increase;
(2) the overall composite average rate increase requested;
(3) the increase requested by plan type;
(4) the date on which the proposed increase would take effect;
(5) the System for Electronic Rate and Form Filing (SERFF) tracking
number associated with the filing and a web address for accessing the filing
electronically; and
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 27 of 52
2025
(6) instructions for submitting public comments and the deadline for
doing so.
(b) Within five business days of after receiving a request for approval of
any composite average rate increase in excess of three 10 percent, or any other
coverage changes which that the Commissioner determines will have a
comparable impact on cost or availability of coverage for a Medicare
supplemental supplement insurance policy issued by any group or nongroup
health insurance company, hospital or medical service organization, or health
maintenance organization, with 5,000 or more total lives in the Vermont
Medicare supplement insurance market, the Commissioner shall notify the
Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living and the Office of
the Health Care Advocate of the proposed premium increase. A composite
average rate is the enrollment-weighted average rate increase of all plans
offered by a carrier.
(b)(c) Within five business days after receiving notification pursuant to
subsection (a)(b) of this section, the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living shall inform the members of the Advisory Board
established pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 505 of the proposed premium increase.
(c)(d)(1) The Commissioner shall not approve any request to increase
Medicare supplemental supplement insurance premium rates unless the amount
of the rate increase complies with the statutory standards for approval under
sections 4062, 4513, 4584, and 5104 of this title. Any approved rate increase
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 28 of 52
2025
shall not be based on an unreasonable change in loss ratio from the previous
year, unless the Commissioner makes written findings that such change is
necessary to prevent a substantial adverse impact on the financial condition of
the insurer. In acting on such rate increase requests, the Commissioner may
deny the request, approve the rate increase as requested, or approve a rate
increase in an amount different from the increase requested. A decision by the
Commissioner other than an approval of the rate requested may be appealed by
the insurer, provided that the burden of proof shall be on the insurer to show
that the approved rate does not meet the statutory standards established under
this subsection.
(2) Before acting on the rate increase requested, the Commissioner may
make such examination or investigation as he or she the Commissioner deems
necessary, including where applicable the review process set forth in
subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(3) In reviewing any Medicare supplement rate increase for which an
independent analysis has been performed pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 6706 and
wherein the carrier’s requested composite average increase, the independent
expert’s recommended composite average rate increase, or the Department
actuary’s recommended composite average rate increase differ by two
percentage points or more, the Commissioner shall hold a public hearing where
the insurer, the Department’s actuary, the independent expert, any intervenor,
and the public will have the opportunity to present written and oral testimony
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 29 of 52
2025
and will be available to answer questions of the Commissioner and those
present. The hearing shall be noticed and held at a time and place so as to
facilitate public participation, and shall be recorded and become part of the
record before the Commissioner. In the Commissioner’s discretion, the
hearing may be conducted through interactive. If the carrier’s requested
composite average increase, the independent expert’s recommended composite
average increase, or the Department actuary’s recommended composite
average increase differs by less than two percentage points, the Department
and the parties shall confer by conference call, or by any other available media,
to review the rate requests and recommendations. However, a public hearing
may be held at the Commissioner’s discretion for good cause shown.
(A) For any filing by a health insurance company, hospital or medical
service organization, or health maintenance organization with 5,000 or more
total lives in the Vermont Medicare supplement insurance market in which the
requested composite average rate increase exceeds 10 percent, the
Commissioner shall:
(i) solicit public comment; and
(ii) hold a public hearing in accordance with the Department of
Financial Regulation’s applicable rules regarding administrative procedures if,
not later than 30 days after the rate filing information is posted on the
Department’s website pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a hearing is
requested by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 30 of 52
2025
by the Office of the Health Care Advocate; or by not fewer than 25
policyholders whose premium rates would be affected by the requested rate
increase.
(B) For any filing that does not meet the criteria specified in
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), a public hearing may be held in the
Commissioner’s discretion.
(C) In the Commissioner’s discretion, a hearing held pursuant to this
subdivision (3) may be conducted through a designated electronic meeting
platform.
(4) In any review held in accordance with this subsection, the
Commissioner shall permit intervention by any person that the Commissioner
determines will materially advance the interests of the insured individuals.
The intervenor shall have access to, and may use the information of the
independent expert appointed under 33 V.S.A. § 6706. The reasonable and
necessary cost of intervention as determined by the Commissioner shall be
paid by the affected policyholders or certificate holders. The maximum
payment shall be $2,500.00 except when waived by the Commissioner for
good cause shown. The $2,500.00 maximum amount may be adjusted to
reflect, at the Commissioner’s discretion, appropriate inflation factors. In any
review held in accordance with this section, the Commissioner shall permit
intervention by any person whom the Commissioner determines will materially
advance the interests of the individuals insured under the policy.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 31 of 52
2025
(5) Nonproprietary, relevant information in any Medicare supplement
rate filing, including any analysis by the Department’s actuary and the
independent expert, shall be made available to the public upon request.
(e) For a Medicare supplement insurance policy with an effective date of
January 1, the insurer shall file its premium rate request pursuant to this section
not later than July 1 of the preceding year. For a Medicare supplement
insurance policy with an effective date other than January 1, the insurer shall
file its rate request pursuant to this section not later than six months prior to the
effective date of the policy.
Sec. 21. REPEAL
33 V.S.A. § 6706 (Medicare supplement insurance; independent analysis) is
repealed.
Sec. 22. 8 V.S.A. § 2571 is amended to read:
§ 2571. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Blockchain” has the same meaning as in 12 V.S.A. § 1913(a)(1).
(2) “Blockchain analytics” means a software service that uses data from
various virtual currencies and their applicable blockchains to provide a risk
rating specific to digital wallet addresses from users of virtual-currency kiosks.
(3) “Digital wallet” means hardware or software that enables individuals
to store and use virtual currency.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 32 of 52
2025
(4) “Digital wallet address” means an alphanumeric identifier
representing a destination on a blockchain for a virtual currency transfer that is
associated with a digital wallet.
(5) “Exchange,” used as a verb, means to assume or exercise control of
virtual currency from or on behalf of a person, including momentarily, to buy,
sell, trade, or convert:
(A) virtual currency for money, monetary value, bank credit, or one
or more forms of virtual currency, or other consideration; or
(B) money, monetary value, bank credit, or other consideration for
one or more forms of virtual currency.
(6) “Existing customer” means a consumer who:
(A) is engaging in a transaction at a virtual-currency kiosk in
Vermont; and
(B) whose first transaction with the virtual-currency kiosk operator
occurred more than 30 days prior.
(7) “New customer” means a consumer who:
(A) is engaging in a transaction at a virtual-currency kiosk in
Vermont; and
(B) whose first transaction with the virtual-currency kiosk operator
occurred not more than 30 days prior.
(2)(8) “Transfer” means to assume or exercise control of virtual
currency from or on behalf of a person and to:
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 33 of 52
2025
(A) credit the virtual currency to the account or digital wallet of
another person;
(B) move the virtual currency from one account or digital wallet of a
person to another account or digital wallet of the same person; or
(C) relinquish or transfer control or ownership of virtual currency to
another person, digital wallet, distributed ledger address, or smart contract.
Sec. 23. 8 V.S.A. § 2574 is amended to read:
§ 2574. REQUIRED DISCLOSURES
(a) Licensee disclosures, generally. A person licensed under subchapter 2
of this chapter to engage in virtual-currency business activity shall provide the
disclosures required by this section and any additional disclosure the
Commissioner determines reasonably necessary for the protection of the
public.
(1) A disclosure required by this section must be made separately from
any other information provided by the licensee and in a clear and conspicuous
manner in a record the person may keep.
(2) The Commissioner may waive one or more requirements in
subsections (b)–(d) of this section and approve alternative disclosures proposed
by a licensee if the Commissioner determines that the alternative disclosure is
more appropriate for the virtual-currency business activity and provides the
same or equivalent information and protection to the public.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 34 of 52
2025
(b) Licensee disclosures prior to business activity. Before engaging in
virtual-currency business activity with a person, a licensee shall disclose, to the
extent applicable to the virtual-currency business activity the licensee will
undertake with the person:
(1) a schedule of fees and charges the licensee may assess, the manner
by which fees and charges will be calculated if they are not set in advance and
disclosed, and the timing of the fees and charges, including general disclosure
regarding mark-ups and mark-downs on purchases, sales, or exchanges of
virtual currency in which the licensee or any affiliate thereof is acting in a
principal capacity;
(2) whether the product or service provided by the licensee is covered
by:
(A) a form of insurance or is otherwise guaranteed against loss by an
agency of the United States:
(i) up to the full U.S. dollar equivalent of virtual currency
purchased from the licensee or for control of virtual currency by the licensee as
of the date of the placement or purchase, including the maximum amount
provided by insurance under the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or
otherwise available from the Securities Investor Protection Corporation; or
(ii) if not provided at the full U.S. dollar equivalent of virtual
currency purchased from the licensee or for control of virtual currency by the
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 35 of 52
2025
licensee, the maximum amount of coverage for each person expressed in the
U.S. dollar equivalent of the virtual currency; or
(B) private insurance against theft or loss, including cyber theft or
theft by other means;
(3) the irrevocability of a transfer or exchange and any exception to
irrevocability;
(4) a description of:
(A) liability for an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfer or
exchange;
(B) the person’s responsibility to provide notice to the licensee of the
transfer or exchange;
(C) the basis for any recovery by the person from the licensee;
(D) general error-resolution rights applicable to the transfer or
exchange; and
(E) the method for the person to update the person’s contact
information with the licensee;
(5) that the date or time when the transfer or exchange is made and the
person’s account is debited may differ from the date or time when the person
initiates the instruction to make the transfer or exchange;
(6) whether the person has a right to stop a preauthorized payment or
revoke authorization for a transfer and the procedure to initiate a stop-payment
order or revoke authorization for a subsequent transfer;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 36 of 52
2025
(7) the person’s right to receive a receipt, trade ticket, or other evidence
of the transfer or exchange;
(8) the person’s right to at least 30 days’ prior notice of a change in the
licensee’s fee schedule, other terms and conditions of operating its virtual-
currency business activity with the person, and the policies applicable to the
person’s account; and
(9) that virtual currency is not money.
(c) Disclosures.
(1) Disclosures prior to each virtual-currency transaction. In connection
with any virtual-currency transaction effected through a money transmission
virtual-currency kiosk in this State, or in any transaction where the licensee or
any affiliate thereof is acting in a principal capacity in a sale of virtual
currency to, or purchase of virtual currency from, a customer, then
immediately prior to effecting such a purchase or sale transaction with or on
behalf of a customer, a licensee shall prominently disclose and shall require the
customer to acknowledge and confirm the terms and conditions of the virtual-
currency transaction, which shall include the following:
(1)(A) the type, value, date, precise time, and amount of the
transaction; and
(2)(B) the consideration charged for the transaction, including:
(A)(i) any charge, fee, commission, or other consideration for any
trade, exchange, conversion, or transfer involving virtual currency; and
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 37 of 52
2025
(B)(ii) any difference between the price paid by the customer for
any virtual currency and the prevailing market price of such virtual currency, if
any;
(C) for a customer of a virtual-currency kiosk, a description of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator’s refund policy, which shall be consistent with
the requirements specified in subsections 2577(k) and (l) of this subchapter;
(D) for a customer of a virtual-currency kiosk, the customer warning
described in subdivision (g)(1) of this section; and
(E) the daily transaction limit, if applicable.
(2) Disclosures for new kiosk accounts. When opening an account for a
new customer, and prior to entering into an initial transaction for, on behalf of,
or with such customer, each virtual-currency kiosk operator shall disclose
relevant terms and conditions associated with its products, services, and
activities and with virtual currency, generally, including disclosures
substantially similar to the following:
(A) the customer’s liability for unauthorized virtual-currency
transactions;
(B) under what circumstances the virtual-currency kiosk operator
will, absent a court or government order, disclose information concerning the
customer’s account to third parties;
(C) the customer’s right to receive periodic account statements and
valuations from the virtual-currency kiosk operator;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 38 of 52
2025
(D) the customer’s right to receive a receipt, trade ticket, or other
evidence of a transaction;
(E) the customer’s right to prior notice of a change in the virtual-
currency kiosk operator’s rules or policies;
(F) a statement of the material risks associated with virtual-currency
transactions, generally, as described in subsection (h) of this section;
(G) the name and telephone number of the Department of Financial
Regulation and a statement disclosing that a customer may contact the
Department with questions or complaints about a licensee; and
(H) such other disclosures as are customarily given in connection
with the opening of customer accounts.
(d) Licensee receipt requirements. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (e) of this section, at the conclusion of a virtual-currency
transaction with or on behalf of a person, a licensee shall provide the person
with a receipt that contains:
(1) the name and contact information of the licensee, including
information the person may need to ask a question or file a complaint;
(2) the type, value, date, precise time, and amount of the transaction
expressed in U.S. currency;
(3) the consideration charged for the transaction, including:
(A) any charge, fee, commission, or other consideration for any trade,
exchange, conversion, or transfer involving virtual currency; or
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 39 of 52
2025
(B) the amount of any difference between the price paid by the
customer for any virtual currency and the prevailing market price of such
virtual currency, if any; and
(4) any other information required pursuant to section 2562 of this title.
(e) Licensee daily confirmation. If a licensee discloses that it will provide
a daily confirmation in the initial disclosure under subsection (c)(b) of this
section, the licensee may elect to provide a single, daily confirmation for all
transactions with or on behalf of a person on that day instead of a per-
transaction confirmation.
(f) Kiosk transaction receipt. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, a virtual-currency kiosk operator shall provide a customer with
both a paper and an electronic receipt in a retainable form for each virtual-
currency transaction completed at a virtual-currency kiosk. In addition to the
information required to be included in a receipt under subsection (d) of this
section or under section 2562 of this title, each receipt for virtual-currency
transaction completed at a virtual-currency kiosk shall include:
(1) the identification of any applicable digital wallet address to which
virtual currency is transmitted;
(2) the full name of the account owner;
(3) any unique transaction identifiers;
(4) a prominent statement of the virtual-currency kiosk operator’s refund
obligations under this section, in a form approved by the Commissioner;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 40 of 52
2025
(5) a statement of the operator’s liability for nondelivery or delayed
delivery of virtual currency; and
(6) the name and telephone number of the Department of Financial
Regulation and a statement disclosing that a customer may contact the
Department with questions or complaints about an operator.
(g) Customer warning.
(1) Prior to entering into a virtual-currency transaction with a customer
at a virtual-currency kiosk, and as required by subdivision (c)(1)(D) of this
section, each virtual-currency kiosk operator shall ensure a warning is
disclosed to the customer substantially similar to the following:
Customer Notice. Please Read Carefully.
Did you receive a phone call from your bank, software provider, the police,
or were you directed to make a payment for Social Security, a utility bill, an
investment, warrants, or bail money at this kiosk? STOP
Is anyone on the phone pressuring you to make a payment of any kind?
STOP
I understand that the purchase and sale of cryptocurrency may be a final,
irreversible, and nonrefundable transaction.
I confirm I am sending funds to a digital wallet I own or directly have
control over. I confirm that I am using funds gained from my own initiative to
make my transaction.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 41 of 52
2025
(2) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall ensure a customer has a
readily accessible opportunity to end a transaction for any reason prior to its
completion.
(h) Statement of material risks. As used in subdivision (c)(2)(F) of this
section, a statement of material risks associated with virtual-currency
transactions, generally, shall include disclosures substantially similar to the
following:
(1) Virtual currency is not legal tender, is not backed by the
government, and accounts and value balances are not subject to Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation or Securities Investor Protection Corporation
protections.
(2) Legislative and regulatory changes or actions at the State, federal, or
international level may adversely affect the use, transfer, exchange, and value
of virtual currency.
(3) Transactions in virtual currency may be irreversible and,
accordingly, losses due to fraudulent or accidental transactions may not be
recoverable.
(4) Some virtual-currency transactions shall be deemed to be made
when recorded on a public ledger, which is not necessarily the date or time that
the customer initiates the transaction.
(5) The value of virtual currency may be derived from the continued
willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for virtual
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 42 of 52
2025
currency, which may result in the potential for permanent and total loss of
value of a particular virtual currency should the market for that virtual
currency disappear.
(6) There is no assurance that a person who accepts a virtual currency as
payment today will continue to do so in the future.
(7) The volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency
relative to fiat currency may result in significant loss over a short period of
time.
(8) The nature of virtual currency may lead to an increased risk of fraud
or cyber attack.
(9) The nature of virtual currency means that any technological
difficulties experienced by the virtual-currency kiosk operator may prevent the
access or use of a customer’s virtual currency.
(10) Any bond or trust account maintained by the virtual-currency kiosk
operator for the benefit of its customers may not be sufficient to cover all
losses incurred by customers.
Sec. 24. 8 V.S.A. § 2577 is amended to read:
§ 2577. VIRTUAL-CURRENCY KIOSK OPERATORS
(a) Daily transaction limit.
(1) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall not accept or dispense more
than $1,000.00 $2,000.00 of cash in a day in connection with virtual-currency
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 43 of 52
2025
transactions with a single, new customer in this State via one or more money
transmission virtual-currency kiosks.
(2) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall not accept or dispense more
than $5,000.00 of cash in a day in connection with virtual-currency
transactions with a single, existing customer in this State via one or more
virtual-currency kiosks.
(b) Fee cap. The aggregate fees and charges, directly or indirectly, charged
to a customer related to a single transaction or series of related transactions
involving virtual currency effected through a money transmission kiosk in this
State, including any difference between the price charged to a customer to buy,
sell, exchange, swap, or convert virtual currency and the prevailing market
value of such virtual currency at the time of such transaction, shall not exceed
the greater of the following:
(1) $5.00; or
(2) three 15 percent of the U.S. dollar equivalent of virtual currency
involved in the transaction or transactions.
(c) Single transaction. The purchase, sale, exchange, swap, or conversion
of virtual currency, or the subsequent transfer of virtual currency, in a series of
transactions shall be deemed to be a single transaction for purposes of
subsection (b) subsections (a) and (b) of this section.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 44 of 52
2025
(d) Licensing requirement. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall comply
with the licensing requirements of this subchapter to the extent that the virtual-
currency kiosk operator engages in virtual-currency business activity.
(e) Operator accountability. If a virtual-currency kiosk operator allows or
facilitates another person to engage in virtual-currency business activity via a
money transmission virtual-currency kiosk in this State that is owned,
operated, or managed by the virtual-currency kiosk operator, the virtual-
currency kiosk operator shall do all of the following:
(1) ensure that the person engaging in virtual-currency business activity
is licensed under subchapter 2 of this chapter to engage in virtual-currency
business activity and complies with all other applicable provisions of this
chapter;
(2) ensure that any charges collected from a customer via the money
transmission virtual-currency kiosk comply with the limits provided by fee cap
established in subsection (b) of this section; and
(3) comply with all other applicable provisions of this chapter.
(f) Moratorium. To protect the public safety and welfare and safeguard the
rights of consumers, virtual-currency kiosks shall not be permitted to operate
in Vermont prior to July 1, 2025 2026. This moratorium shall not apply to a
virtual-currency kiosk that was duly licensed and operational in Vermont on or
before June 30, 2024.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 45 of 52
2025
(g) Report. On or before January 15, 2025, the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation shall report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Finance on whether the
requirements of this section coupled with relevant federal requirements are
sufficient to protect customers in Vermont from fraudulent activity. If deemed
necessary and appropriate by the Commissioner, the Commissioner may make
recommendations for additional statutory or regulatory safeguards. In
addition, the Commissioner shall make recommendations for enhanced
oversight and monitoring of virtual-currency kiosks for the purpose of
minimizing their use for illicit activities as described in the U.S. Government
Accountability Office report on virtual currencies, GAO-22-105462, dated
December 2021. Customer identification. For each virtual-currency
transaction occurring at a virtual-currency kiosk in this State, the virtual-
currency kiosk operator shall verify the identity of the customer prior to
accepting payment from the customer. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall
not allow a customer to engage in any transaction at a virtual-currency kiosk
under any name, account, or identity other than the customer’s own true name
and identity. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall obtain a copy of a
government-issued identification card that identifies the customer and shall
collect additional customer information, including the customer’s name, date
of birth, telephone number, address, and email address prior to accepting any
payment from a customer at a virtual-currency kiosk in this State. In addition,
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 46 of 52
2025
a virtual-currency kiosk operator shall take a photograph of the customer in a
retainable format at the virtual-currency kiosk for each transaction. A virtual-
currency kiosk operator shall be strictly liable for any violation of this
subsection.
(h) Customer support. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall offer live,
toll-free, telephone customer support during the hours of operation of a virtual-
currency kiosk. The customer support telephone number shall be displayed on
the virtual-currency kiosk or on the virtual-currency kiosk screen.
(i) Mandatory live screening.
(1) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall identify and speak by
telephone with:
(A) a new customer over 60 years of age prior to such customer’s
first virtual-currency transaction with the virtual-currency kiosk operator; or
(B) a customer attempting to conduct more than $5,000.00 in virtual-
currency transactions during any consecutive 10-day period.
(2) The virtual-currency kiosk operator’s approval of a transaction
subject to a mandatory live screening under this subsection shall be dependent
upon its assessment of its communication with the customer during the
screening.
(3) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall record and retain a copy of
each mandatory live screening.
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 47 of 52
2025
(4) During the mandatory live screening, the virtual-currency kiosk
operator shall:
(A) positively identify the customer;
(B) reconfirm any attestations made by the customer at the virtual-
currency kiosk;
(C) discuss the purpose of the transaction; and
(D) discuss types of fraudulent schemes relating to virtual currency.
(j) Blockchain analytics. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall use
blockchain analytics software and retain an established third party that
specializes in performing blockchain analytics to assist in the prevention of
sending purchased virtual currency from a virtual-currency kiosk operator to a
digital wallet known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a
transaction. The Commissioner may request evidence from any virtual-
currency kiosk operator of its current use of blockchain analytics.
(k) Full refund for new customers. The virtual-currency kiosk operator
shall provide a full refund to a customer who was fraudulently induced to
engage in a virtual-currency kiosk transaction, provided the fraudulently
induced transaction occurred while the customer was a new customer and
further provided the customer contacts the virtual-currency kiosk operator and
a law enforcement or government agency to inform the operator and the
agency of the fraudulent nature of the transaction within 90 days after the
customer’s last virtual-currency transaction with the virtual-currency kiosk
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 48 of 52
2025
operator. The refund shall include any fees charged in association with the
fraudulently induced transaction.
(l) Fee refund for existing customers. The virtual-currency kiosk operator
shall provide a fee refund to an existing customer who has been fraudulently
induced to engage in a virtual-currency kiosk transaction, provided the
customer contacts the virtual-currency kiosk operator and a law enforcement or
government agency to inform the operator and the agency of the fraudulent
nature of the transaction within 90 days after the last fraudulently induced
transaction. The refund shall include all fees charged in association with the
fraudulently induced transaction.
(m) Fraud prevention. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall take
reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and
maintaining a written antifraud policy. The antifraud policy shall, at a
minimum, include the following:
(1) the identification and assessment of fraud-related risk areas;
(2) procedures and controls to protect against identified risks;
(3) allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks;
(4) procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the antifraud
procedures, controls, and monitoring mechanisms;
(5) procedures and controls that prevent more than one customer from
using the same digital wallet;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 49 of 52
2025
(6) procedures and controls that enable the virtual-currency kiosk
operator to prevent a digital wallet from being used at a virtual-currency kiosk
it operates if the operator knows or reasonably should know the digital wallet
is affiliated with fraudulent activities; and
(7) policies and procedures for using a risk-based method for monitoring
customers on a post transaction basis.
(n) Due diligence policy. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall maintain,
implement, and enforce a written Enhanced Due Diligence Policy. The Policy
shall be reviewed and approved by the virtual-currency kiosk operator’s board
of directors or an equivalent governing body of the virtual-currency kiosk
operator. The Policy shall identify, at a minimum, individuals who are at risk
of fraud based on age or mental capacity.
(o) Compliance policies. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall maintain,
implement, and enforce written compliance policies and procedures. Such
policies and procedures shall be reviewed and approved by the virtual-currency
kiosk operator’s board of directors or an equivalent governing body of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator.
(p) Compliance officer.
(1) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall designate and employ a
compliance officer who meets the following requirements:
(A) is qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this
section and all other applicable federal and State laws and regulations;
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 50 of 52
2025
(B) is employed full-time by the virtual-currency kiosk operator; and
(C) is not an individual who owns more than 20 percent of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.
(2) Compliance responsibilities required under federal and State law and
regulation shall be completed by one or more full-time employees of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator.
(q) Consumer protection officer. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall
designate and employ a consumer protection officer who meets the following
requirements:
(1) is qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this section
and all other applicable federal and State laws and regulations;
(2) is employed full-time by the virtual-currency kiosk operator; and
(3) is not an individual who owns more than 20 percent of the virtual-
currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.
(r) The Commissioner may adopt rules the Commissioner deems necessary
and proper to carry out the purposes of this section, including with respect to
what constitutes fraudulent activity or a fraudulently induced transaction in the
context of customer transactions at a virtual-currency kiosk.
Sec. 25. 8 V.S.A. § 13301 is amended to read:
§ 13301. CORPORATORS OF MUTUAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
(a) Persons named in the organizational documents constitute the original
board of corporators of a mutual financial institution. Membership on this
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 51 of 52
2025
board continues until terminated by death, resignation, or disqualification as
provided in this section.
(b) All corporators shall be residents of the geographic area that the
financial institution serves or an area proximate to this geographic area. A
person may shall not continue as a corporator after ceasing to be a resident of
the financial institution’s geographic area or an area proximate to this
geographic area.
(c) Any corporator failing to attend the annual meeting of the board of
corporators for two successive years ceases to be a member of the board unless
reelected by a vote of the remaining corporators.
(d) The number of corporators may be fixed or altered by the internal
governance documents of the financial institution, and vacancies may be filled
by election at any annual meeting.
(e) More than 50 percent of all corporators shall be depositors of the
financial institution.
(f) At least two-thirds of all corporators shall be independent. As used in
this subsection, an “independent corporator” means an individual who is not an
employee, director, or officer of the financial institution, its subsidiaries, or its
affiliates.
(g) Corporators shall be fiduciaries of the depositor base and shall exercise
their authority in the best interests of the depositors with a duty of loyalty and
care. In exercising their duties as corporators, corporators shall consider the
VT LEG #383901 v.1

No. 23 Page 52 of 52
2025
interests of the depositors, the borrowers, and other customers of the financial
institution; the general benefit and economic well-being of the communities
served by the financial institution; and the safety, soundness, and general
business needs of the financial institution.
Sec. 26. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that Secs. 20 and 21
(Medicare supplement insurance) shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: May 19, 2025
VT LEG #383901 v.1